District of Columbia statutes.
47-1034

National Society of the Sons of the American Revolution.

All property, real and personal, belonging to or held by the National Society of the Sons of the American Revolution in the District of Columbia, used, and occupied by that Society for its purposes, so long as the same is so owned, used, and occupied, is exempt from taxation, national and municipal.

June 16, 1934, 48 Stat. 972, ch. 547
Oct. 25, 1949, 63 Stat. 888, ch. 709, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1034.
1973 Ed., § 47-827.